California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act-A Legacy for Users of 2005 (Public Law 109-059), also known as SAFETEA-LU, elevated the Highway Safety Improvement Program (HSIP) to a core program (23 U.S.C. Sec. 148). SAFETEA-LU authorized appropriations for programs relating to highway safety improvements that can reduce the number of fatal and serious injury accidents. The core HSIP program includes two set-aside programs: the railway-highway crossing program (23 U.S.C. Sec. 130) and the high-risk rural roads program (23 U.S.C. Sec. 148(f)). The purpose of this chapter is to implement these programs in this state. The commission, the department, boards of supervisors, and city councils are authorized to do all things necessary in their respective jurisdictions to secure and expend federal funds in accordance with the intent of that federal act and this chapter, and to coordinate with local law enforcement agencies’ community policing efforts.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 392, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 673, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2332.

All funds received pursuant to these federal programs shall be deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. All funds apportioned to the state for such programs are appropriated for allocation by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

2333.

In each annual proposed budget prepared pursuant to Section 165, there shall be included an amount equal to the estimated apportionment available from the federal government for the programs described in Sections 2331 and 2333.5. The commission may allocate a portion of those funds each year for use on city streets and county roads. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission allocate the total funds received from the federal government under Section 148 of Title 23 of the United States Code in approximately equal amounts between state highways and local roads. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the share of any railroad of the cost of maintaining railroad crossing protection facilities funded, in whole or in part, by funds described in Section 2331 shall be the same share it would be if no federal funds were involved and the crossing protection facilities were funded pursuant to an order of the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 1202 of the Public Utilities Code; and in case of dispute, the Public Utilities Commission shall determine that share pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 392, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2334.

Expenditure of such funds on local streets and roads shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 188 and 188.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Federal Aid for Urban Systems [2350. - 2360.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2350. - 2352.]

2350.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Federal Aid for Urban Systems Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 201.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------

2351.

The Federal-Aid Highway Acts of 1970 and 1973 have authorized appropriations for expenditure on the federal-aid urban system within the designated boundaries of urban and urbanized areas for street and highway projects and for public mass transit projects, including the purchase of equipment. The purpose of this chapter is to implement such program in this state. The boards of supervisors, city councils, the department, and the commission are authorized to do all things possible in their respective jurisdictions to secure the federal funds for use on construction of county highways, city streets, and state highways, and for public mass transit projects, in accordance with the intent of the federal act and of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 95.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------

2352.

The Legislature recognizes that federal aid for urban systems was deleted from federal law by the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (Public Law 102-240), and that a period of time is required to account for expenditures of apportionments of federal funds provided for these purposes under previous federal transportation acts. This chapter shall remain in effect until the director determines that apportionments of all federal aid for urban systems have been expended. Upon making that determination, the director shall submit a notice to that effect to the Secretary of State, and this chapter shall be repealed on the January 1 following the receipt of that notice by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1177, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 1992.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Chapter 7, comprising Sections 2350 to 2360.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [2356. - 2360.]

2356.

The department, in cooperation with the committee, shall establish operating procedures and take such other actions as are appropriate to comply with the provisions of this chapter and with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1740.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------

2358.

Funds apportioned to this state pursuant to subsection (b)(6) of Section 104 of Title 23 of the United States Code for federal urban system projects shall be allocated by the commission. Projects eligible for allocation include fringe parking projects, state highway projects, local street and highway projects, and public mass transit projects. The commission shall review the long-range planning programs for the urban system, and shall review each annual program for conformance with the long-range programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1124, Sec. 22.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------

2359.

(a) The department may advance the federal share of each urban system project on a county road or a city street from the money appropriated by the Legislature and allocated by the commission in conformance with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) Expenditures of federal urban system funds, or federal general funds substituted therefor, shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 188 and 188.8.

(c) Counties and cities may use any funds available to them to match funds made available to them, if the use of funds for such matching purposes is not prohibited by federal law or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 98.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------

2360.

Funds apportioned by the United States Secretary of Transportation to public entities in California for federal-aid urban system projects shall be obligated by the recipient public entity within three years of the year of the apportionment of the funds to the state by the secretary.

Any federal-aid urban funds that are not obligated within the three-year period shall be reapportioned by the department to other projects under terms and conditions established by the department and approved by the FAU Systems Advisory Committee. The public entity receiving a reapportionment shall compensate the recipient of the original apportionment in an amount equal to at least 60 percent of the amount of the reapportionment.

The director shall notify each public entity six months prior to the end of the three-year period in which the public entity is required to obligate the funds that the department intends to reapportion under this section. A public entity receiving notification may request a hearing before the FAU Systems Advisory Committee for an extension of the three-year requirement. The FAU Systems Advisory Committee may grant the public entity an extension of time in which to obligate the funds if it makes a finding that the public entity has shown that the extension is justified.

The department, in cooperation with the FAU Systems Advisory Committee, shall certify that a recipient agency will be able to expend funds based on project readiness and its ability to meet funding requirements. The department shall provide to the commission all information relating to the reallocation of federal-aid urban funds on the state highway system. The commission may amend the state transportation improvement plan to reflect changes deemed appropriate by the commission resulting from reallocations.

This section applies to federal-aid urban funds apportioned prior to January 1, 1986, but the three-year period for any funds apportioned prior to January 1, 1986, shall begin on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 892, Sec. 1.   Inoperative upon determination described in Section 2352.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, as provided in Section 2352.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Federal Funds for Transportation Enhancements [2370. - 2374.]

2370.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Community conservation corps” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) “Transportation enhancement project” means a project constructed or undertaken with funds made available to the state pursuant to Section 133(b)(8) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2371.

(a) The department, in consultation with community conservation corps, the California Conservation Corps, the commission, regional transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions or authorities, and congestion management agencies, shall develop criteria that give priority in the selection of projects to the sponsors of eligible projects that partner with, or commit to employ the services of, a community conservation corps or the California Conservation Corp to construct or undertake the project

(b) Regional transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions or authorities, and congestion management agencies, when selecting candidates for transportation enhancement projects, shall utilize the criteria in subdivision (a) that give priority in the selection of projects to the sponsors of eligible projects that partner with, or commit to employ the services of, a community conservation corps or the California Conservation Corps to construct or undertake the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2372.

The department, regional transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions or authorities, or congestion management agencies shall be authorized to enter into cooperative agreements, grant agreements, or procurement contracts with community conservation corps pursuant to the simplified contract requirements authorized by Section 18.36(j) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations in order to enable community conservation corps to utilize transportation enhancement project funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2373.

The commission, when developing guidelines for the state transportation improvement program and the state highway operations and protection program, shall include guidance to encourage the allocation of funds for transportation enhancement projects to qualified community conservation corps and the California Conservation Corps as partners with applicants that commit to employ the services of corps members in the construction of those projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2374.

The criteria prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2373 and the guidelines prepared pursuant to Section 2371 relative to the allocation of funds for transportation enhancement projects to qualified community conservation corps and the California Conservation Corps shall further the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Active Transportation Program [2380. - 2385.]

2380.

There is hereby established the Active Transportation Program in the department for the purpose of encouraging increased use of active modes of transportation, such as biking and walking. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program achieve all of the following goals:

(a) Increase the proportion of trips accomplished by biking and walking.

(b) Increase safety and mobility for nonmotorized users.

(c) Advance the active transportation efforts of regional agencies to achieve greenhouse gas reduction goals as established pursuant to Senate Bill 375 (Chapter 728, Statutes of 2008) and Senate
 Bill 391 (Chapter 585, Statutes of 2009).

(d) Enhance public health, including reduction of childhood obesity through the use of programs including, but not limited to, projects eligible for Safe Routes to School Program funding.

(e) Ensure that disadvantaged communities fully share in the benefits of the program.

(f) Provide a broad spectrum of projects to benefit many types of active transportation users.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 359, Sec. 15.   (SB 99)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2381.

(a) The Active Transportation Program shall be funded by state and federal funds from appropriations in the annual Budget Act. Funds for the program shall be appropriated to the department, for allocation by the commission. The amount to be appropriated shall include 100 percent of the federal Transportation Alternative Program funds described in Section 133(h) of Title 23 of the United States Code, except for any federal funds for recreational trails projects described in Section 133(h)(5) of Title 23 of the United States Code appropriated to the Department of Parks and
 Recreation; twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) of federal Highway Safety Improvement funds or other federal funds; and State Highway Account funds. Future funding may be augmented if state or federal funds increase, or if other funding sources are identified. Funds appropriated for the Active Transportation Program shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Forty percent to metropolitan planning organizations in urban areas with populations greater than 200,000, in proportion to their relative share of population. Funds allocated under this paragraph shall be obligated for eligible projects selected through a competitive process by the metropolitan planning organizations in consultation with the department and the commission and in accordance with guidelines established pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Ten percent to small urban and rural regions with populations of 200,000 or less, with projects competitively awarded by the commission to projects in those regions.

(3) Fifty percent to projects competitively awarded by the commission on a statewide basis.

(b) For the purpose of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the following shall apply in the region served by the multicounty designated transportation planning agency described in Section 130004 of the Public Utilities Code:

(1) The multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall consult with the county transportation commissions created pursuant to Sections 130050, 130050.1, and 132800 of
 the Public Utilities Code, the commission, and the department in the development of competitive selection criteria to be adopted by the multicounty designated transportation planning agency, which should include consideration of geographic equity, consistent with program objectives.

(2) The multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall place priority on projects that are consistent with plans adopted by local and regional governments within the county where the project is located.

(3) The multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall obtain concurrence from the county transportation commissions, adopt the projects selected in a comprehensive program of projects, and make funds available to selected project recipients.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the program described in this chapter constitutes a highway purpose under Article XIX of the California Constitution and justifies the expenditure of highway funds therefor, and all expenditures of Article XIX funds under this program shall be consistent with Article XIX.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2382.

(a) The California Transportation Commission shall develop guidelines and project selection criteria for the Active Transportation Program in consultation with the Active Transportation Program Workgroup, which shall be formed for purposes of providing guidance on matters including, but not limited to, development of and subsequent revisions to program guidelines, schedules and procedures, project selection criteria, performance measures, and program evaluation. The workgroup shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of government agencies and active transportation stakeholder organizations with expertise in pedestrian and bicycle issues, including Safe Routes to School programs.

(b) The guidelines shall be the complete and full statement of the policies and criteria that the commission intends to use in selecting projects to be included in the program. The guidelines shall address subjects that include, but are not limited to, project eligibility, application timelines, application rating and ranking criteria, project monitoring, reporting, and transparency, and project performance measurement.

(c) The guidelines shall include a process to ensure that no less than 25 percent of overall program funds benefit disadvantaged communities during each program cycle. The guidelines shall establish a program definition for disadvantaged communities that may include, but need not be limited to, the definition in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code and the definition of low-income schools in paragraph (7) of
 subdivision (b) of former Section 2333.5, as that section read on January 1, 2013. A project eligible under this subdivision shall clearly demonstrate a benefit to a disadvantaged community or be directly located in a disadvantaged community.

(d) The guidelines shall allow streamlining of project delivery by authorizing an implementing agency to seek commission approval of a letter of no prejudice that will allow the agency to expend its own funds for a project programmed in a future year of the adopted program of projects, in advance of allocation of funds to the project by the commission, and to be reimbursed at a later time for eligible expenditures.

(e) The California Transportation Commission shall adopt the guidelines and selection criteria for, and define the types of
 projects eligible to be funded through, the program following at least two public hearings. Projects funded in this program shall be limited to active transportation projects. The guidelines shall ensure that eligible projects meet one or more of the goals set forth in Section 2380 and may give increased weight to projects meeting multiple goals.

(f) In developing the guidelines with regard to project eligibility, the commission shall include, but need not be limited to, the following project types:

(1) Development of new bikeways and walkways, or improvements to existing bikeways and walkways, that improve mobility, access, or safety for nonmotorized users. On and after January 1, 2026, the guidelines with regard to project eligibility shall not include the development
 of Class III bikeways, as described in Section 890.4, or the marking in Figure 9C-9 of the 2014 California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, Revision 8, unless any of the following apply:

(A) The Class III bikeway or marking is on a highway with a design speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less.

(B) The project will implement improvements to reduce the design speed limit to 25 miles per hour or less.

(C) The project applicant demonstrates that the use of the Class III bikeway or marking is appropriate for the local community context and advances a lower stress environment or a low-stress network.

(2) Secure bicycle parking at employment centers, park
 and ride lots, rail and transit stations, and ferry docks and landings.

(3) Bicycle-carrying facilities on public transit, including rail and ferries.

(4) Installation of traffic control devices to improve the safety of pedestrians and bicyclists.

(5) Elimination of hazardous conditions on existing bikeways and walkways.

(6) Maintenance of bikeways and walkways.

(7) Recreational trails and trailheads, park projects that facilitate trail linkages or connectivity to nonmotorized corridors, and conversion of abandoned railroad corridors to trails.

(8) Safe Routes to School projects that improve the safety of children walking and bicycling to school, in accordance with Section 1404 of Public Law 109-59.

(9) Safe routes to transit projects, which will encourage transit by improving biking and walking routes to mass transportation facilities and schoolbus stops.

(10) Educational programs to increase biking and walking, and other noninfrastructure investments that demonstrate effectiveness in increasing active transportation.

(g) In developing the guidelines with regard to project selection, the commission shall include, but need not be limited to, the following criteria:

(1) Demonstrated
 needs of the applicant.

(2) Potential for reducing pedestrian and bicyclist injuries and fatalities.

(3) Potential for encouraging increased walking and bicycling, especially among students.

(4) Identification of safety hazards for pedestrians and bicyclists.

(5) Identification of walking and bicycling routes to and from schools, transit facilities, and community centers.

(6) Identification of the local public participation process that culminated in the project proposal, which may include noticed public meetings and consultation with local stakeholders.

(7) Benefit to disadvantaged communities. In developing guidelines relative to this paragraph, the commission shall consider, but need not be limited to, the definition of disadvantaged communities as applied pursuant to subdivision (c).

(8) Cost-effectiveness, defined as maximizing the impact of the funds provided.

(9) The adoption by a city or county applicant of a bicycle transportation plan, pursuant to Section 891.2, a pedestrian plan, a safe routes to school plan, or an overall active transportation plan.

(10) Use of the California Conservation Corps or a qualified community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code, as partners to undertake or construct applicable
 projects in accordance with Section 1524 of Public Law 112-141.

(11) Other factors, such as potential for reducing congestion, improving air quality, reducing greenhouse gas emissions, and increasing and improving connectivity and mobility of nonmotorized users. On and after January 1, 2026, increasing or improving connectivity of nonmotorized users shall not include the addition of a bikeway connecting to a Class III bikeway, as described in Section 890.4, or the marking in Figure 9C-9 of the 2014 California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, Revision 8, unless the bikeway or marking is on a highway with a design speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less or the project will
 implement improvements to reduce the design speed limit to 25 miles per hour or less.

(h) For the use of federal Transportation Alternative Program funds, or other federal funds, commission guidelines shall meet all applicable federal requirements.

(i) For the use of federal Highway Safety Improvement Program funds for active transportation projects specific to reducing fatalities and serious injuries, the criteria for the selection of projects shall be based on a data-driven process that is aligned with the state’s Strategic Highway Safety Plan.

(j) The guidelines may include incentives intended to maximize the potential for attracting funds other than program funds for eligible projects.

(k) In reviewing and selecting projects funded by federal funds in the Recreational Trails Program, the commission shall collaborate with the Department of Parks and Recreation to evaluate proposed projects, and to ensure federal requirements are met.

(l) To ensure that regional agencies charged with allocating funds to projects pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2381 have sufficient discretion to develop regional guidelines, the commission may adopt separate guidelines for the state and for the regional agencies relative to subdivision (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 788, Sec. 2.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2383.

The commission may amend the adopted guidelines after conducting at least one public hearing. The commission shall make a reasonable effort to amend the guidelines prior to the call for projects or may extend the deadline for project submission in order to comply with the new guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 359, Sec. 15.   (SB 99)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2384.

(a) The commission shall adopt a program of projects to receive allocations under this chapter. The guidelines for an initial two-year program of projects shall be adopted within six months of the enactment of the act enacting this section. The commission shall adopt each program by no later than July 1 of each odd-numbered year, but may alternatively elect to adopt a program annually. Each subsequent program shall cover a period of four fiscal years, beginning July 1 of the year of adoption, and shall be a statement of intent by the commission for the allocation or expenditure of funds during those four fiscal years. The commission shall form a multidisciplinary advisory group to assist it in evaluating project applications.

(b) On and after January 1, 2026, the program of projects shall not add a project that creates a Class III bikeway, as described in Section 890.4, or the marking in Figure 9C-9 of the 2014 California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, Revision 8, unless any of the following apply:

(1) The Class III bikeway or marking is on a highway with a design speed limit of 25 miles per hour or less.

(2) The project will implement improvements to reduce the design speed limit to 25 miles per hour or less.

(3) The project applicant demonstrates that the use of the Class III bikeway or marking is appropriate for the local community context and advances a lower stress
 environment or a low-stress network.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 788, Sec. 3.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2385.

The department shall administer the program consistent with the guidelines adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 359, Sec. 15.   (SB 99)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. Congested Corridors [2390. - 2397.]

2390.

The Solutions for Congested Corridors Program is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2391.

Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11053 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in the State Highway Account shall be available for appropriation to the Department of Transportation in each annual Budget Act for the Solutions for Congested Corridors Program. Funds made available for the program shall be allocated by the California Transportation Commission to projects designed to achieve a balanced set of transportation, environmental, and community access improvements within highly congested travel corridors throughout the state. Funding shall be available for projects that make specific performance improvements and are part of a comprehensive corridor plan designed to reduce congestion in highly traveled corridors by providing more transportation choices for residents, commuters,
 and visitors to the area of the corridor while preserving the character of the local community and creating opportunities for neighborhood enhancement projects. In order to mitigate increases in vehicle miles traveled, greenhouse gases, and air pollution, highway lane capacity-increasing projects funded by this program shall be limited to high-occupancy vehicle lanes, managed lanes as defined in Section 14106 of the Government Code, and other non-general purpose lane improvements primarily designed to improve safety for all modes of travel, such as auxiliary lanes, truck climbing lanes, or dedicated bicycle lanes. Project elements within the corridor plans may include improvements to state highways, local streets and roads, public transit facilities, bicycle and pedestrian facilities, and restoration or preservation work that protects critical local habitat or open space.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2392.

A regional transportation planning agency or county transportation commission or authority responsible for preparing a regional transportation improvement plan under Section 14527 of the Government Code or the department may nominate projects for funding through the program that are consistent with the policy objectives of the program as set forth in this chapter. The commission shall allocate no more than one-half of the funds available each year to projects nominated exclusively by the department. Preference shall be given to corridor plans that demonstrate that the plans and the specific project improvements to be undertaken are the result of collaboration between the department and local or regional partners that reflect a comprehensive approach to addressing congestion and quality-of-life issues within the affected corridor
 through investment in transportation and related environmental solutions. Collaboration between the partners may be demonstrated by a project being jointly nominated by both the regional agency and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2393.

A project nomination shall include documentation regarding the quantitative and qualitative measures validating the project’s consistency with the policy objectives of the program as set forth in this chapter. In addition to being included in a corridor plan, a nominated project shall also be included in the region’s regional transportation plan. Projects within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization must be included in an adopted regional transportation plan that includes a sustainable communities strategy determined by the State Air Resources Board to achieve the region’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2394.

The commission shall allocate program funds to projects after reviewing the corridor plans submitted by the regional agencies or the department and making a determination that a proposed project is consistent with the objectives of the corridor plan. In addition to making a consistency determination with respect to project nominations, the commission shall score the proposed projects on the following criteria:

(a) Safety.

(b) Congestion.

(c) Accessibility.

(d) Economic development and job creation and retention.

(e) Furtherance of state and federal ambient air standards and greenhouse gas emissions reduction standards pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38550) of the Health and Safety Code) and Senate Bill 375 (Chapter 728 of the Statutes of 2008).

(f) Efficient land use.

(g) Matching funds.

(h) Project deliverability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2395.

The commission shall adopt an initial program of projects to be funded through the initial appropriation for the program. The initial program may cover a multiyear programming period. Subsequent programs of projects shall be adopted on a biennial basis consistent with available funds for the program, and may include updates to programs of projects previously adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2396.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall develop and adopt guidelines for the program consistent with the requirements of this chapter. Guidelines adopted by the commission shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Prior to adopting the guidelines, the commission shall conduct at least one public hearing in northern California and one public hearing in southern California to review and provide an opportunity for public comment. The commission shall adopt the final guidelines no sooner than 30 days after the commission provides the proposed guidelines to the Joint
 Legislative Budget Committee and the transportation policy committees in the Senate and the Assembly.

(b) The guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) may include streamlining of project delivery by authorizing regional agencies to seek commission approval of a letter of no prejudice that allows the agency to expend its own funds for a project programmed in a future year of the adopted program of projects, in advance of allocation of funds to the project by the commission, and to be reimbursed at a later time for eligible expenditures. A letter of no prejudice shall only be available to local or regional transportation agencies for moneys that have been identified for future allocation to the applicant agency. Moneys designated for the program shall only be reimbursed when there is funding available in an amount sufficient to make the reimbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 255, Sec. 8.   (AB 135)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2397.

On or before March 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the commission shall provide project update reports on the development and implementation of the program described in this chapter in its annual report to the Legislature prepared pursuant to Section 14535 of the Government Code. A copy of the report shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the transportation policy committees of both houses of the Legislature. The report, at a minimum, shall include information on each project that received funding under the program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A summary describing the overall progress of the project since the initial award.

(b) Expenditures to date
 for all project phase costs.

(c) A summary of milestones achieved during the prior year and milestones expected to be reached in the coming year.

(d) An assessment of how the project is meeting the quantitative and qualitative measurements identified in the project nomination, as outlined in Section 2393.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 44.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Federal Aid for Bridge Reconstruction and Replacement [2400. - 2414.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2400. - 2401.]

2400.

This chapter may be cited as the Bridge Reconstruction and Replacement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

By the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1970, Congress has enacted Section 144 of Title 23 of the United States Code, and has authorized appropriations thereby for expenditures under the Special Bridge Replacement Program to replace or reconstruct bridges when the state and the federal government determine that the bridge is of significant importance and is unsafe because of structural deficiencies, including seismic deficiencies, or physical deterioration, or functional obsolescence. The purpose of this chapter is to implement this program in this state. The boards of supervisors, city councils, the department, and the commission may do all things necessary and proper in their respective jurisdictions to secure the federal funds under the program for county highways, city streets, and state highways in accordance with the intent of the federal act and this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 6.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [2410. - 2414.]

2410.

The department, cities, and counties are authorized to cooperate with the federal government in any inventory or classification of bridges requested by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

2411.

The department, after conferring with the cities and the counties, shall recommend state and local projects and take such other action within the powers conferred on it by law as to comply with this chapter as fully as applicable federal laws, rules, or regulations permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

2412.

The boards of supervisors, city councils, and the department are authorized to enter into cooperative agreements, and to do all other things necessary and proper in their respective jurisdictions, to secure federal aid under the Special Bridge Replacement Program in accordance with the intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

2413.

(a) The department may allocate to the counties and the cities federal funds received for approved bridge reconstruction or replacement projects on county roads or city streets in accordance with procedures promulgated by the director in cooperation with the counties and the cities and approved by the commission.
